Utah statutes.
58-38a-201.   Controlled Substances Advisory Committee.

There is created within the Division of Occupational and Professional Licensing the Controlled Substances Advisory Committee.  The committee consists of:

(1)  the director of the Department of Health or the director's designee;

(2)  the State Medical Examiner or the examiner's designee;

(3)  the commissioner of the Department of Public Safety or the commissioner's designee;

(4)  one physician who is a member of the Physicians Licensing Board and is designated by that board;

(5)  one pharmacist who is a member of the Utah State Board of Pharmacy and is designated by that board;

(6)  one dentist who is a member of the Dentist and Dental Hygienist Licensing Board and is designated by that board;

(7)  one physician who is currently licensed and practicing in the state, to be appointed by the governor;

(8)  one psychiatrist who is currently licensed and practicing in the state, to be appointed by the governor;

(9)  one individual with expertise in substance abuse addiction, to be appointed by the governor;

(10)  one representative from the Statewide Association of Prosecutors, to be designated by that association;

(11)  one naturopathic physician who is currently licensed and practicing in the state, to be appointed by the governor;

(12)  one advanced practice registered nurse who is currently licensed and practicing in this state, to be appointed by the governor; and

(13)  one member of the public, to be appointed by the governor.

